Utah statutes.
53C-4-202.   Lease and permit covenants.

Each surface lease or user permit shall contain the following covenants:

(1)  the lessee or permittee shall promptly pay the rent annually upon demand;

(2)  no waste may be committed on the land;

(3)  the premises shall be promptly surrendered at the expiration of the term;

(4)  the lessee or permittee may not sublet or assign without the prior written consent of the director;

(5)  failure to pay the agreed rent for a period of one month from the time rent is due shall result in a forfeiture of the lease or permit after notice; and

(6)  where authorized improvements have been placed on the land by any person other than the lessee or permittee, the director may require the lessee or permittee to allow the owner of the improvements to remove them within 90 days.



Amended by Chapter 299, 1995 General Session

